test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-s70_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - æra: # 
    siga+V+Inf: siga
    siga+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: sigur
    siga+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: segði
    siga+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: søgdu
    siga+V+Sup: sagt
    siga+V+PrfPrc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: sagdur
